hu: Kompatibilis gitártest-formák: Concert/Grand concert akusztikus; Dreadnought akusztikus; Üreges testű/Archtop; Jazzmaster/Jaguar offset; Jumbo akusztikus; Les Paul/Single-cut; OM/000 akusztikus; SG/Double-cut; Stratocaster/Strat stílusú; Superstrat; Telecaster/Tele stílusú; Utazó/mini gitár; Univerzális/állítható méret; Egyéb
vi: Hình dạng thân đàn guitar tương thích: Acoustic dáng Concert/Grand concert; Acoustic dáng Dreadnought; Dáng Hollowbody/Archtop; Dáng vát Jazzmaster/Jaguar; Acoustic dáng Jumbo; Dáng Les Paul/Single-cut; Acoustic dáng OM/000; Dáng SG/Double-cut; Dáng Stratocaster/Strat; Dáng Superstrat; Dáng Telecaster/Tele; Guitar du lịch/mini; Phổ thông/Kích cỡ điều chỉnh được; Khác
ja: 互換性のあるギターボディShapes: コンサート/グランドコンサート・アコースティック; ドレッドノート・アコースティック; ホロウボディ/アーチトップ; ジャズマスター/ジャガー・オフセット; ジャンボ・アコースティック; レスポール/シングルカッタウェイ; OM/000・アコースティック; SG/ダブルカッタウェイ; ストラトキャスター/ストラトタイプ; スーパーストラト; テレキャスター/テレタイプ; トラベル/ミニギター; ユニバーサル/サイズ調整可能; その他
zh-CN: 适配吉他琴身造型: Concert/Grand Concert 原声吉他; Dreadnought 原声吉他; 空心/拱顶; Jazzmaster/Jaguar 偏置型; Jumbo 原声吉他; Les Paul/单缺角; OM/000 原声吉他; SG/双缺角; Stratocaster/Strat 风格; Superstrat; Telecaster/Tele 风格; 旅行/迷你吉他; 通用/可调节尺寸; 其他
pt-PT: Forma de corpo de guitarra compatível: Acústica de concerto/grande concerto; Acústica dreadnought; Corpo oco/archtop; Offset Jazzmaster/Jaguar; Acústica jumbo; Les Paul/corte único; Acústica OM/000; SG/corte duplo; Stratocaster/estilo Strat; Superstrat; Telecaster/estilo Tele; Guitarra de viagem/mini; Ajuste universal/ajustável; Outro
el: Συμβατό σχήμα σώματος κιθάρας: Ακουστική concert/grand concert; Ακουστική dreadnought; Hollowbody/Archtop; Jazzmaster/Jaguar offset; Ακουστική jumbo; Les Paul/Single-cut; Ακουστική OM/000; SG/Double-cut; Stratocaster/Στυλ Strat; Superstrat; Telecaster/Στυλ Tele; Travel/Κιθάρα mini; Γενικής χρήσης/Προσαρμόσιμη εφαρμογή; Άλλο
cs: Kompatibilní tvar těla kytary: Koncertní / Grand Concert akustická; Dreadnought akustická; Lubová/Archtop; Jazzmaster / Jaguar offset; Jumbo akustická; Les Paul / Single-cut; OM/000 akustická; SG / Double-cut; Stratocaster / styl Strat; Superstrat; Telecaster / styl Tele; Cestovní/mini kytara; Univerzální / nastavitelná velikost; Jiné
ru: Совместимая форма корпуса гитары: Концертная / гранд-концерт; Дредноут; Полуакустика / арктоп; Офсетная (Jazzmaster / Jaguar); Джамбо; Les Paul / с одним вырезом; Акустическая OM/000; SG / с двумя вырезами; Stratocaster / в стиле Strat; Суперстрат; Telecaster / в стиле Tele; Тревел-гитара / мини-гитара; Универсальный / регулируемый размер; Другое
ko: 호환 기타 바디 형상: 콘서트/그랜드 콘서트 어쿠스틱; 드레드넛 어쿠스틱; 할로우바디/아치탑; 재즈마스터/재규어 오프셋; 점보 어쿠스틱; 레스폴/싱글컷; OM/000 어쿠스틱; SG/더블컷; 스트라토캐스터/스트랫 스타일; 슈퍼스트랫; 텔레캐스터/텔레 스타일; 트래블/미니 기타; 범용/조절 가능; 기타
fi: Yhteensopiva kitaran rungon muoto: Concert / Grand Concert -akustinen; Dreadnought-akustinen; Hollowbody / Archtop; Jazzmaster / Jaguar -offset; Jumbo-akustinen; Les Paul / Single-cut; OM/000-akustinen; SG / Double-cut; Stratocaster / Strat-tyylinen; Superstrat; Telecaster / Tele-tyylinen; Matka- / minikitara; Yleinen / säädettävä istuvuus; Muu
de: Kompatible Gitarrenkorpusform: Concert-/Grand-Concert-Akustik; Dreadnought-Akustik; Hollowbody/Archtop; Jazzmaster/Jaguar-Offset; Jumbo-Akustik; Les Paul/Single-Cut; OM/000-Akustik; SG/Double-Cut; Stratocaster/Strat-Style; Superstrat; Telecaster/Tele-Style; Reise-/Minigitarre; Universal/Anpassbare Passform; Sonstige
pl: Kompatybilny kształt korpusu gitary: Akustyczna Concert/Grand Concert; Akustyczna Dreadnought; Hollowbody / Archtop; Offsetowa Jazzmaster/Jaguar; Akustyczna Jumbo; Les Paul / Single-cut; Akustyczna OM/000; SG / Double-cut; Stratocaster / Strat-style; Superstrat; Telecaster / Tele-style; Gitara podróżna / mini; Uniwersalny / Regulowany; Inne
zh-TW: 相容的吉他琴身形狀: Concert/Grand concert 木吉他; Dreadnought 木吉他; 空心吉他/拱頂吉他; Jazzmaster/Jaguar 偏移琴身; Jumbo 木吉他; Les Paul/單切角; OM/000 木吉他; SG/雙切角; Stratocaster/Strat 風格; Superstrat; Telecaster/Tele 風格; 旅行/迷你吉他; 通用/可調式貼合; 其他
bg-BG: Съвместима форма на тялото на китара: Concert/Grand concert акустична; Dreadnought акустична; Hollowbody/Archtop; Jazzmaster/Jaguar offset; Jumbo акустична; Les Paul/Single-cut; OM/000 акустична; SG/Double-cut; Stratocaster/Strat стил; Superstrat; Telecaster/Tele стил; Туристическа/мини китара; Универсална/с възможност за регулиране; Друго
tr: Uyumlu gitar gövde şekli: Concert/Grand concert akustik; Dreadnought akustik; Tam oyuk kasa/Archtop; Jazzmaster/Jaguar offset; Jumbo akustik; Les Paul/Tek kesim; OM/000 akustik; SG/Çift kesim; Stratocaster/Strat stili; Superstrat; Telecaster/Tele stili; Seyahat/Mini gitar; Evrensel/Ayarlanabilir kesim; Diğer
fr: Forme de corps de guitare compatible: Acoustique Concert/Grand concert; Acoustique Dreadnought; Demi-caisse/Archtop; Offset Jazzmaster/Jaguar; Acoustique Jumbo; Les Paul/Single-cut; Acoustique OM/000; SG/Double-cut; Stratocaster/Type Strat; Superstrat; Telecaster/Type Tele; Guitare de voyage/mini; Universel/taille réglable; Autre
nb: Kompatible gitarformer: Concert-/Grand concert-akustisk; Dreadnought-akustisk; Hollowbody/Archtop; Jazzmaster-/Jaguar-offset; Jumbo-akustisk; Les Paul/Single-cut; OM-/000-akustisk; SG/Double-cut; Stratocaster/Strat-stil; Superstrat; Telecaster/Tele-stil; Reise-/minigitar; Universell / justerbar passform; Annet
nl: Compatibele gitaarbody vorm: Concert/Grand Concert akoestisch; Dreadnought akoestisch; Hollowbody/archtop; Jazzmaster/Jaguar-offset; Jumbo akoestisch; Les Paul/single-cut; OM/000 akoestisch; SG/double-cut; Stratocaster/Strat-stijl; Superstrat; Telecaster/Tele-stijl; Reis-/minigitaar; Universeel/verstelbare pasvorm; Overig
it: Shapesdel corpo della chitarra compatibili: Acustica Concert/Grand Concert; Acustica Dreadnought; Hollowbody/Archtop; Offset Jazzmaster/Jaguar; Acustica Jumbo; Les Paul/Single-cut; Acustica OM/000; SG/Double-cut; Stratocaster/Stile Strat; Superstrat; Telecaster/Stile Tele; Chitarra da viaggio/Mini; Vestibilità universale/regolabile; Altro
en: Compatible guitar body shape: Concert/Grand concert acoustic; Dreadnought acoustic; Hollowbody/Archtop; Jazzmaster/Jaguar offset; Jumbo acoustic; Les Paul/Single-cut; OM/000 acoustic; SG/Double-cut; Stratocaster/Strat-style; Superstrat; Telecaster/Tele-style; Travel/Mini guitar; Universal/Adjustable fit; Other
th: รูปทรงตัวกีตาร์ที่ใช้งานด้วยได้: อะคูสติกทรง Concert/Grand concert; อะคูสติกทรง Dreadnought; ทรง Hollowbody/Archtop; ทรง Jazzmaster/Jaguar offset; อะคูสติกทรง Jumbo; ทรง Les Paul/Single-cut; อะคูสติกทรง OM/000; ทรง SG/Double-cut; ทรง Stratocaster/Strat; ทรง Superstrat; ทรง Telecaster/Tele; กีตาร์พกพา/มินิ; อเนกประสงค์/ปรับขนาดได้; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Združljive oblike telesa kitare: Akustična kitara Concert/Grand concert; Akustična kitara Dreadnought; Hollowbody/Archtop; Jazzmaster/Jaguar (offset); Akustična kitara Jumbo; Les Paul/Single-cut; Akustična kitara OM/000; SG/Double-cut; Stratocaster/slog Strat; Superstrat; Telecaster/slog Tele; Potovalna/mini kitara; Univerzalno/prilagodljivo; Drugo
es: Forma de cuerpo de guitarra compatible: Acústica de concierto/gran concierto; Acústica dreadnought; Cuerpo hueco/archtop; Offset Jazzmaster/Jaguar; Acústica jumbo; Les Paul/corte simple; Acústica OM/000; SG/doble corte; Stratocaster/estilo Strat; Superstrat; Telecaster/estilo Tele; Guitarra de viaje/mini; Ajuste universal/regulable; Otro
hr-HR: Kompatibilan oblik tijela gitare: Koncertna/velika koncertna akustična; Dreadnought akustična; Šuplje tijelo (hollowbody) / archtop; Jazzmaster/Jaguar offset; Jumbo akustična; Les Paul / single-cut; OM/000 akustična; SG / double-cut; Stratocaster / u stilu Strata; Superstrat; Telecaster / u stilu Telea; Putna/mini gitara; Univerzalno/prilagodljivo; Ostalo
sv: Kompatibla gitarrformer: Konsert/grand concert (akustisk); Dreadnought (akustisk); Hollowbody/archtop; Jazzmaster/Jaguar (offset); Jumbo (akustisk); Les Paul/single-cut; OM/000 (akustisk); SG/double-cut; Stratocaster/Strat-stil; Superstrat; Telecaster/Tele-stil; Resegitarr/minigitarr; Universell/justerbar passform; Övrigt
pt-BR: Formato do corpo da guitarra compatível: Acústico concert/grand concert; Acústico dreadnought; Hollowbody/Archtop; Jazzmaster/Jaguar offset; Acústico jumbo; Les Paul/Single-cut; Acústico OM/000; SG/Double-cut; Stratocaster/Estilo Strat; Superstrat; Telecaster/Estilo Tele; Viagem/Miniguitarra; Universal/Ajustável; Outro
lt-LT: Suderinama gitaros korpuso forma: „Concert“ / „Grand concert“ akustinė; „Dreadnought“ akustinė; Tuščiavidurė / „Archtop“; „Jazzmaster“ / „Jaguar“ asimetrinė; „Jumbo“ akustinė; „Les Paul“ / vienos išpjovos („single-cut“); OM / 000 akustinė; SG / dviejų išpjovų („double-cut“); „Stratocaster“ / „Strat“ stiliaus; „Superstrat“; „Telecaster“ / „Tele“ stiliaus; Kelioninė / mini gitara; Universalus / reguliuojamas dydis; Kita
sk-SK: Kompatibilný tvar tela gitary: Akustická Concert/Grand concert; Akustická Dreadnought; Hollowbody/Archtop; Offset Jazzmaster/Jaguar; Akustická Jumbo; Les Paul/Single-cut; Akustická OM/000; SG/Double-cut; Stratocaster/tvar Strat; Superstrat; Telecaster/tvar Tele; Cestovná/mini gitara; Univerzálny/prispôsobiteľný tvar; Iné
ro-RO: Formă compatibilă a corpului de chitară: Acustică Concert / Grand concert; Acustică Dreadnought; Hollowbody / Archtop; Offset Jazzmaster / Jaguar; Acustică Jumbo; Les Paul / Single-cut; Acustică OM/000; SG / Double-cut; Stratocaster / stil Strat; Superstrat; Telecaster / stil Tele; Chitară de călătorie / Mini; Universal / ajustabil; Altele
da: Kompatibel guitar-kropsform: Akustisk concert/grand concert; Akustisk dreadnought; Hollowbody/archtop; Jazzmaster/Jaguar-offset; Akustisk jumbo; Les Paul/Single-cut; Akustisk OM/000; SG/Double-cut; Stratocaster/Strat-stil; Superstrat; Telecaster/Tele-stil; Rejse-/miniguitar; Universel/justerbar pasform; Andet